Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2064.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The secretary of state shall explore options for an electronic ballot portal to be available for covered voters that are not able to access standard mail return of voted ballots.(2) Only covered voters shall be permitted to use an approved portal to return voted ballots.(3)(a) The secretary of state must work to develop and test electronic methods of ballot return for covered voters that are secure against electronic monitoring and incursion or interference, provide the maximum level of voter secrecy and privacy available, and ensure that only a single vote is cast by any covered voter.(b) The secretary of state may establish rules governing the use of any approved portal that include times of availability, storage of ballots, and establishing the circumstance in which a covered voter may use the portal to return a voted ballot.(c) The secretary of state may establish reasonable rules related to the standards and procedures for the examination and testing of any portal to be used by covered voters.(d) Each county election office using an approved portal for the return of voted covered ballots must keep record of every attempt at ballot return, successful and unsuccessful, and prepare a report at the conclusion of each voting period listing the number of ballots returned using the portal and confirming that only covered voters used the portal. The report must be submitted to the secretary of state using the deadlines contained in RCW 29A.60.190.(e) The secretary of state shall prepare a statewide report each year aggregating the information provided by each county.(f) No electronic ballot portal may be approved or deployed without express statutory authority.(g) Beginning December 1, 2025, and each December 1st thereafter, and in compliance with RCW 43.01.036, the secretary of state shall submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature on its progress developing the portal. The final report is due on December 1, 2028.(4) "Covered voter" means:(a) A service voter or overseas voter as defined in RCW 29A.04.163 and 29A.04.109;(b) A disabled voter as defined in RCW 29A.04.037; or(c) An eligible voter who is incarcerated in the state, except individuals who have had their voting rights revoked and not yet restored in accordance with RCW 29A.08.520.--- END ---